District of Columbia statutes.
4-209.01

Investigation of applicants; issuance of identification cards; distribution of checks.

(a)

Whenever the Mayor shall receive an application for public assistance, he or she shall promptly make an investigation and record of the circumstances of the applicant in order to ascertain the facts supporting the application and to obtain such other information as he or she may require.

(b)

After determining that a person is eligible to receive public assistance, the Mayor may issue to such person a public assistance identification card which may be used by such person in obtaining any public assistance, and as a means of identifying him or her as the proper recipient of such public assistance. The public assistance identification card shall contain the name, social security number, and account or case number of the recipient to whom such card was issued.

(c)

The Mayor may by rule prescribe additional uses and requirements with respect to the issuance and use of the public assistance identification card as he or she deems necessary. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require recipients of public assistance to receive their monthly allotment checks in person at 1 central location. The Mayor shall by rule establish such means of distribution of such checks which, utilizing the public assistance identification card, will insure the least amount of fraud and loss of such checks without unduly burdening the recipients of such checks.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 901, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(ddd), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-209.1.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(ddd) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(ddd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(ddd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(ddd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(ddd) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).